Illinois, session 104th, HB4896.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5adding Section 13-109.2 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/13-109.2 new)7    Sec. 13-109.2. Tenancy in common, intestate succession.8    (a) A person or persons with an ownership interest in 9lands or tenements held as tenants in common, who acquired an 10ownership interest through intestate succession under Article 112 of the Probate Act of 1975, and who are in actual possession 12of the lands or tenements, may commence an action seeking to be 13adjudged the legal owner or owners of the lands or tenements to 14the exclusion of any nonclaiming owner or owners, if the court 15finds that:16        (1) the person or persons bringing the action each 17    have a household income of under 80% of area median income 18    as determined by the United States Department of Housing 19    and Urban Development for the county where the lands or 20    tenements are located;21        (2) the person or persons bringing the action have 22    conducted a search, with due diligence, for anyone who may 23    have an ownership interest in the property;   HB4896 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17427 JRC 30852 b1        (3) for 7 successive years, the person or persons 2    bringing the action have:3            (A) held exclusive possession of the lands or 4        tenements, with or without the permission or knowledge 5        of others who may hold an interest in the lands or 6        tenements as tenants in common;7            (B) paid or caused to be paid all taxes legally 8        assessed on the lands or tenements; and9            (C) acquired an ownership interest in the lands or 10        tenements through intestate succession; and 11        (4) for 7 successive years, no other person or persons 12    holding an ownership interest in the lands or tenements as 13    tenants in common have:14            (A) contributed to any taxes assessed on the lands 15        or tenements, other than a lender under the 16        Residential Mortgage License Act of 1987 making 17        payments of taxes as part of its duties related to a 18        mortgage loan;19            (B) contributed to the care, maintenance, or 20        improvement of the lands or tenements; or21            (C) asserted or acted to preserve any interest in 22        or any claim related to the lands or tenements; and23        (5) the requirements of subsection (b) are satisfied 24    and no objection is made by a person or persons with a bona 25    fide ownership interest in the subject lands or tenements 26    as tenants in common as set forth under subsection (c).   HB4896 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17427 JRC 30852 b1    (b) A minimum of 2 years before commencing an action under 2subsection (a), a person or persons shall: 3        (1) file a signed declaration with the recorder of 4    deeds in the county where the lands or tenements are 5    located that provides a legal description of the subject 6    lands or tenements and states the person's or persons':7            (A) intention to seek ownership of lands or 8        tenements to the exclusion of any nonclaiming owner or 9        owners;10            (B) ownership interest in the lands or tenements 11        as tenants in common;12            (C) exclusive possession of the property and 13        consistent payment of all taxes legally assessed on 14        the lands or tenements; and15            (D) belief that no other person or persons with an 16        ownership interest in the lands or tenements have 17        contributed to the payment of taxes or the care, 18        maintenance, or improvement of the lands or tenements; 19        and20        (2) send written notice after conducting the search 21    described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) to any person 22    or persons who hold an ownership interest in the lands or 23    tenements by certified and first-class mail to their last 24    known address that includes:25            (A) a statement of intention to seek ownership of 26        lands or tenements to the exclusion of any nonclaiming   HB4896 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17427 JRC 30852 b1        owner or owners, including the address or a 2        description of the lands or tenements;3            (B) a notification that the person or persons with 4        an ownership interest in the lands or tenements may 5        file an objection with the recorder of deeds in the 6        county where the lands or tenements are located as set 7        forth in subsection (c); and8            (C) an attached copy of the declaration described 9        in paragraph (1); and10        (3) send a message after conducting the search 11    described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) to any person 12    or persons who hold an ownership interest in the lands or 13    tenements by email at their last known email address, if 14    any, and by text at their last known telephone number, if 15    any, that includes:16            (A) a statement of intention to seek ownership of 17        lands or tenements to the exclusion of any nonclaiming 18        owner or owners, including the address or a 19        description of the lands or tenements; and20            (B) a notification that the person or persons with 21        an ownership interest in the lands or tenements may 22        file an objection with the recorder of deeds in the 23        county where the lands or tenements are located as set 24        forth in subsection (c); and25        (4) publish or cause to be published one notice of the 26    claim under the Notice by Publication Act in a newspaper   HB4896 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17427 JRC 30852 b1    of general circulation covering the county, city, or 2    township where the lands or tenements are located. 3    (c) A person or persons with an ownership interest in the 4lands or tenements may object to a claim under this Section by 5filing an objection with the recorder of deeds in the county 6where the lands or tenements are located. The objection shall:7        (1) be signed by the person or persons objecting;8        (2) describe the subject lands or tenements;9        (3) state that the objecting person or persons have an 10    ownership interest in the subject lands or tenements; and11        (4) declare their objection.